Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 459.488 is amended to read:
459.488. ORS 459.485 does not apply to:
(1) A lamp  used for image capture and projection, including photocopying, printing, directly or
in preprocessing, lithography, film and video projection and holography.
(2) A lamp that has a high proportion of ultraviolet light emission and is one of the following:
(a) A  lamp with high ultraviolet content that has ultraviolet power greater than two milliwatts
per kilolumen.
(b) A lamp for germicidal use, such as the destruction of DNA (deoxyribonucleic  acid), that
emits a peak radiation of approximately 253.7 nanometers.
(c) A lamp used for disinfection or fly trapping from which either:
(A) The radiation power emitted between  250 and 315 nanometers represents at least five per-
cent of the total radiation power emitted between 250 and 800 nanometers; or
(B) The radiation  power emitted between 315 and 400 nanometers represents at least 20 percent
of the total radiation power emitted between 250 and 800 nanometers.
(d) A lamp used  for the generation of ozone where the primary purpose is to emit radiation at
approximately 185.1 nanometers.
(e) A lamp used for coral zooxanthellae symbiosis from which the  radiation power emitted be-
tween 400 and 480 nanometers represents at  least 40 percent of the total radiation power emitted
between 250 and 800 nanometers.
(f) Any lamp used in an electronic product designed to incorporate one or more ultraviolet lamps
and intended for  irradiation of any part of the living human body by ultraviolet radiation, with
wavelengths in air between 200 and 400 nanometers, to induce skin tanning.
(3) A lamp used in a medical device or otherwise used for medical or veterinary diagnosis  or
treatment.
(4) A lamp used in pharmaceutical product manufacturing or quality control.
(5) A lamp used for spectroscopy and photometric applications, including  ultraviolet-visible
spectroscopy, molecular spectroscopy,  atomic absorption spectroscopy, nondispersive infrared
(NDIR), Fourier transform infrared (FTIR), medical analysis, ellipsometry, layer thickness  measure-
ment, process monitoring or environmental monitoring.
Enrolled House Bill 2307 (HB 2307-INTRO) Page 1
(6) A lamp  used by academic or research institutions exclusively for conducting research
projects or experiments.
(7) A compact  fluorescent lamp used to replace a lamp in a motor vehicle manufactured on or
before January 1, 2020.
(8) A lamp purchased by a  school district, as defined in ORS 332.002, for use in school
buildings.
SECTION 2.  ORS 459.488, as amended by section 1 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
459.488. ORS 459.485 does not apply to:
(1) A lamp used for image capture and projection, including photocopying, printing,  directly or
in preprocessing, lithography, film and video projection and holography.
(2) A lamp that has a high proportion of ultraviolet light emission and is one of the following:
(a) A lamp with high ultraviolet content that has ultraviolet power greater than two  milliwatts
per kilolumen.
(b) A lamp  for germicidal use, such as the destruction of DNA (deoxyribonucleic acid), that
emits a peak radiation of approximately 253.7 nanometers.
(c) A lamp used for disinfection or fly trapping from which either:
(A) The radiation power emitted between 250 and 315 nanometers  represents at least five per-
cent of the total radiation power emitted between 250 and 800 nanometers; or
(B) The radiation  power emitted between 315 and 400 nanometers represents at least 20 percent
of the total radiation power emitted between 250 and 800 nanometers.
(d) A lamp used for the generation of ozone where the primary purpose is to  emit radiation at
approximately 185.1 nanometers.
(e) A lamp used for  coral zooxanthellae symbiosis from which the radiation power emitted be-
tween 400 and 480 nanometers represents at least 40 percent  of the total radiation power emitted
between 250 and 800 nanometers.
(f) Any lamp used in an electronic product designed to incorporate one or more ultraviolet lamps
and intended for irradiation of any part of the living human body by ultraviolet  radiation, with
wavelengths in air between 200 and 400 nanometers, to induce skin tanning.
(3) A  lamp used in a medical device or otherwise used for medical or veterinary diagnosis or
treatment.
(4) A lamp used in pharmaceutical product manufacturing or quality control.
(5) A  lamp used for spectroscopy and photometric applications, including ultraviolet-visible
spectroscopy, molecular spectroscopy, atomic absorption spectroscopy,  nondispersive infrared
(NDIR), Fourier  transform infrared (FTIR), medical analysis, ellipsometry, layer thickness measure-
ment, process monitoring or environmental monitoring.
(6) A lamp used by academic or research institutions exclusively for  conducting research
projects or experiments.
(7) A compact fluorescent lamp used to replace a lamp in a motor vehicle manufactured  on or
before January 1, 2020.
[(8) A lamp purchased by a school district, as defined in ORS 332.002, for use in school
buildings.]
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 459.488 by  section 2 of this 2025 Act become oper-
ative on January 2, 2030.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 2307 (HB 2307-INTRO) Page 2
Passed by House March 24, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 21, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2307 (HB 2307-INTRO) Page 3